Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1927YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 743 Section 1. Section 414.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. For the purpose of promoting 3 the general welfare of the community, a city may regulate 4 the density of the population and the use of a building for 5 single-family residential purposes by requiring the purchaser 6 of a single-family residential home to physically occupy the 7 home for a minimum of two years before attempting to resell the 8 single-family residential home. A city may make exceptions to 9 the two-year requirement to allow a sale for good faith reasons 10 on the part of the purchaser who wants to sell the home. 11 b. For purposes of this subsection, âoccupyâ means to 12 physically reside in and use a property as a home, residence, 13 or sleeping place. 14